Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-110
Contempt; punishment; effect on other proceedings.

Punishment for contempt, as provided in sections 50-105 to 50-109, is no bar to any other proceedings, civil or criminal, for the same offense.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 12, p. 251;

R.S.1913, § 3751;

C.S.1922, § 3144;

C.S.1929, § 50-110;

R.S.1943, § 50-110.